California, session 20252026, AB2280.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3075 is added to the Civil Code, immediately following Section 3074, to read:3075. (a) This chapter does not prohibit a repossession agency licensed pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code from filing a lien, if a lien is not in place.(b) If a lien is currently in place, and the lienholder affirmatively waives the right to the lien in writing, or does not respond to a request for waiver within 30 days of notice being mailed to the lienholder, a repossession agency may file the lien on behalf of the repossession agency. agency, consistent with this chapter.